Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-3308
Curative clauses; cumulative.

The curative clauses of the Offstreet Parking District Act are cumulative, and each is to be given full effect.

Laws 1967, c. 60, § 8, p. 200;

R.S.Supp.,1967, § 16-819;

Laws 1969, c. 88, § 8, p. 440;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 186.